Illinois, session 104th, HB1839.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Safe 5Autonomous Vehicle (SAVE) Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Automated Driving System" (ADS) means technology 8installed on a motor vehicle that has the capability, on a 9part-time or full-time basis, to drive the vehicle without the 10need for supervision of the driving environment by a human 11driver or operator, whether or not a human driver or operator 12is in the vehicle.13    "Automatic Crash Notification Technology" means a vehicle 14service integrating wireless communications and vehicle 15location technology for the purpose of determining the need 16for or facilitating emergency medical response in the event of 17a vehicle crash.18    "Motor Vehicle Manufacturer" means a person who has 19manufactured and distributed motor vehicles in the United 20States that are certified to comply with all applicable 21federal motor vehicle safety standards and that has submitted 22appropriate manufacturer identification information to the 23National Highway Traffic Safety Administration under 49 CFR   HB1839- 2 -LRB104 08951 LNS 19006 b1part 566. "Motor Vehicle Manufacturer" also means a person 2who: 3        (1) has manufactured ADS equipped vehicles in the 4    United States that are certified to comply with all 5    applicable federal and state laws;6        (2) has operated ADS equipped vehicles using a test 7    driver and with an automated driving system on public 8    roads in the United States for at least 1,000,000 miles; 9    and10        (3) has obtained an instrument of insurance, surety 11    bond, or proof of self-insurance in the amount of at least 12    $10,000,000, and has provided evidence of that insurance, 13    surety bond, or self-insurance to the Department in a form 14    and manner required by the Department.15    "On-Demand Automated Motor Vehicle Network" means a 16digital network, software application, or other means to 17connect passengers to ADS equipped fleet vehicles for 18transportation between points chosen by the passenger.19    "Participating Fleet" means those ADS equipped vehicles 20that are operating on the public roads and highways in a SAVE 21Project.22    "SAVE project" means an initiative authorizing eligible 23Motor Vehicle Manufacturers to make ADS equipped vehicles 24available to the public for operation on the public roads and 25highways of this State in a manner to be determined by such 26Motor Vehicle Manufacturers that is consistent with all of the   HB1839- 3 -LRB104 08951 LNS 19006 b1provisions under this Act. Such operation may include, but is 2not limited to, making an On-Demand Automated Vehicle Network 3available to the public. 4    "Two-Way Vehicle Communication Technology" means a vehicle 5service provided through a wireless communication device 6embedded in a vehicle that enables two-way communication 7between a vehicle occupant and the vehicle manufacturer.  8    Section 10. SAVE Project commencement; boundaries and data 9collection.10    (a) Commencement.11        (1) A Motor Vehicle Manufacturer's eligibility to 12    participate in a SAVE project is conditioned solely upon 13    meeting the requirements under Section 15 of this Act.14        (2) A SAVE Project may be commenced by a Motor Vehicle 15    Manufacturer at any time after it provides notification to 16    the Secretary of State of self-certification under Section 17    15 of this Act. A Motor Vehicle Manufacturer's 18    notification to the Department shall also set forth the 19    geographical boundaries for the SAVE project as described 20    in subsection (b) of this Act.21        (3) Any Motor Vehicle Manufacturer may engage in 22    multiple SAVE projects under this subsection (a). 23    (b) SAVE project boundaries. A Motor Vehicle Manufacturer 24shall determine the geographical boundaries for a SAVE 25project, which may include, but are not limited to, a   HB1839- 4 -LRB104 08951 LNS 19006 b1designated area on the public roads or highways of this State, 2including, but not limited to, a municipality, areas 3maintained by regional authorities, university campuses, 4developments catering to senior citizens, or other similar 5geographic and demographic areas. The public operation of the 6Participating Fleets shall be confined to the boundaries 7selected by a Motor Vehicle Manufacturer.8    (c) Data collection. For the duration of a SAVE project, 9any participating Motor Vehicle Manufacturer shall maintain 10incident records and provide periodic summaries to the 11Department and the National Highway Traffic Safety 12Administration (NHTSA) related to safety for the Participating 13Fleet.14    (d) Disclosure and consent. Individuals participating in 15any SAVE Project are deemed to consent to the collection of 16such data while they are in the vehicle and to the later 17provision of anonymized data summaries to the Department and 18NHTSA. Prior to the commencement of and during a SAVE Project, 19any participating Motor Vehicle Manufacturer shall make 20publicly available a privacy statement disclosing its data 21handling practices in connection with the applicable 22Participating Fleet.  23    Section 15. SAVE project eligibility. Only Motor Vehicle 24Manufacturers are eligible to participate in a SAVE Project 25and they are responsible for the safe operation of the   HB1839- 5 -LRB104 08951 LNS 19006 b1Participating Fleet. In order for a Motor Vehicle Manufacturer 2to be authorized to participate in a SAVE Project, it must 3self-certify to the conditions set forth below: 4    (a) the Participating Fleet is owned or controlled by the 5Motor Vehicle Manufacturer and is equipped with the following 6attributes:7        (1) Automated Driving Systems;8        (2) Automatic Crash Notification Technology; 9        (3) a data recording system with capacity to record 10    the ADS system status and other vehicle attributes such as 11    speed, direction, and location at a specified time period 12    determined by the Motor Vehicle Manufacturer prior to a 13    crash; and 14        (4) Two-Way Vehicle Communication Technology; 15    (b) the Participating Fleet complies with all applicable 16federal and State laws; and17    (c) subject to Section 20 of this Act, the vehicles in the 18Participating Fleet are capable of being operated in 19compliance with applicable traffic and motor vehicle laws of 20this State. 21    Section 20. Traffic and motor vehicle laws.22    (a) When engaged, the ADS shall be considered the driver 23or operator for purposes of assessing conformance to 24applicable traffic or motor vehicle laws, and shall be deemed 25to be validly licensed to operate a motor vehicle under   HB1839- 6 -LRB104 08951 LNS 19006 b1Section 6-101 of the Illinois Vehicle Code and Section 15 of 2the Transportation Network Providers Act; and shall be deemed 3to satisfy all the applicable requirements to be licensed 4under the Illinois Vehicle Code and any physical acts required 5of a driver or operator, including, but not limited to those 6required under Section 6-112 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. No 7motor vehicle laws of this State shall be construed as 8prohibiting an ADS from being the operator or driver of a motor 9vehicle, and no motor vehicle laws of this State shall be 10construed as requiring a licensed human driver to operate a 11vehicle that is being operated by an ADS under this Section. 12    (b) SAVE project vehicles shall be insured by the 13applicable Motor Vehicle Manufacturer consistent with the 14Illinois Insurance Code. 15    (c) For a SAVE project in which the ADS is in control of 16the vehicle, the applicable Motor Vehicle Manufacturer shall 17assume liability for incidents where the ADS technology is at 18fault for such incident, but in all cases consistent with 19existing insurance law and other laws. 20    (d) A Motor Vehicle Manufacturer is immune from any 21liability for damages that arise out of any modification made 22by another person to a vehicle manufactured by the Motor 23Vehicle Manufacturer, or a system or component of the vehicle 24installed by the manufacturer, or to any ADS or automated 25technology, without the Motor Vehicle Manufacturer's written 26consent.  HB1839- 7 -LRB104 08951 LNS 19006 b1    (e) An ADS installed on a motor vehicle that is equipped 2with Automatic Crash Notification Technology shall be deemed 3to be in compliance with all applicable requirements under 4Article IV of Chapter 11 of the Illinois Vehicle Code if the 5Automatic Crash Notification Technology allows a 6representative of the Motor Vehicle Manufacturer to promptly 7connect with law enforcement to report the crash. 8    (f) The requirements under Section 12-603.1 of the 9Illinois Vehicle Code shall be the responsibility of and apply 10only to human occupants of a motor vehicle. The requirements 11of the Child Passenger Protection Act shall be the 12responsibility of and apply only to the parent or guardian of 13the child.14    (g) The provisions of Section 11-1401 of the Illinois 15Vehicle Code shall not apply to an ADS installed on a vehicle 16in a Participating Fleet.17    (h) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, SAVE 18Projects are governed exclusively by this Act. 19    Section 25. Enforcement. 20    (a) Notwithstanding Section 10 of this Act, any person who 21operates or has operated an ADS-operated vehicle on a public 22road or highway in this State or another state or territory of 23the United States without satisfying the applicable 24eligibility requirements, or in express violation of a statute 25or regulation requiring a valid driver's license, permit, or   HB1839- 8 -LRB104 08951 LNS 19006 b1other applicable form of authority to operate a motor vehicle, 2shall not operate an ADS-operated vehicle in this state.3    (b) Evidence.4        (1) A copy of the citation or other official 5    documentation, notice, or information indicating operation 6    without a valid driver's license, permit, or other 7    applicable form of authority to operate, a motor vehicle 8    shall constitute sufficient evidence to prove violation.9        (2) A vehicle operating on public roads without a 10    human driver present in the vehicle shall be presumed to 11    be equipped with ADS and subject to the requirements of 12    this Act. 13    (c) Any person who violates subsection (a) of this Section 14is subject to a fine of $ 10,000.15    (d) A second or subsequent violation of subsection (a) of 16this Section is a Class A misdemeanor.  17    Section 30. Home rule. The regulation of SAVE projects is 18the exclusive power and function of the State. A home rule unit 19may not regulate SAVE projects. This Section is a denial and 20limitation of home rule powers and functions under subsection 21(h) of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.